incubator/apertium-snd/apertium-snd.snd.dix
    <pardef n="سگهن__vaux">

      <e><p><l>سگهان</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهان</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهون</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهون</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>سگهين</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهين</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهو</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهو</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>سگهي</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهي</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهن</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهن</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<!--past-->
      <e><p><l>سگهيُس</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهيس</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهيِس </l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهيس </l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهياسون</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهيونسون</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>سگهئين</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهيِنءَ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهيوَ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهيو</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهيئو</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهيون</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهيئو</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>سگهيو</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگِهي</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهي</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهيا</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>سگهيون</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<!--future-->
	<e  r="LR" c="diac"> <p><l>سگهندُس</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>سگهندس</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>سگهنداسون</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>سگهنداسين</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>سگهندين</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>سگهندئو</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>سگهندو</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>سگهندا</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	<e  r="LR" c="diac"> <p><l>سگهندَس</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>سگهندس</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>سگهنديس</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e  r="LR" c="diac"> <p><l>سگهندِيس</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>سگهنديون</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	<e r="LR" c="diac"> <p><l>سگهندينءَ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>سگهندين</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>سگهنديئو</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	<e r="LR" c="diac"> <p><l>سگهندِي</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>سگهندي</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>سگهنديون</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="سگ"><i></i><par n="سگهن__vaux"/></e>
